Washington, session 2025-2026, HB1108.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. (1) The Washington state institute for public policy must conduct a study researching, analyzing, and determining, to the extent practicable, the primary cost drivers for homeownership and rental housing in Washington state and produce a final report as described in this section.(2) In conducting the study, the Washington state institute for public policy must conduct fact-finding and stakeholder discussions with at least one representative of each of the following groups:(a) Economists with expertise in the economic disciplines most relevant to the issue of housing cost drivers;(b) Nonprofit developers of rental housing;(c) Nonprofit developers of housing for homeownership;(d) For-profit housing developers;(e) Builders;(f) A statewide organization representing the building trades labor;(g) Realtors;(h) Cities;(i) Counties;(j) Tenants;(k) Landlords who provide at least 10 rental housing units;(l) Landlords who provide no more than two rental housing units;(m) A statewide association representing real estate appraisers;(n) Home mortgage lenders;(o) Multifamily lenders;(p) Utility providers;(q) Public housing authorities;(r) The Washington state housing finance commission;(s) The office of equity;(t) The carpenters union;(u) A statewide association representing business; and(v) An organization representing architects.(3) The Washington state institute for public policy must solicit and consider information and perspectives provided by the groups identified in subsection (2) of this section for the purpose of identifying cost drivers for the development of single-family homes, multifamily housing, middle housing, accessory dwelling units and co-living housing, and the impact on homeownership and rental housing in Washington state.(4) The Washington state institute for public policy, in completing the duties prescribed by this section, shall solicit and consider information and perspectives provided by the affordable housing advisory board and persons and entities with relevant interest and expertise.(5) The department of commerce must cooperate with the Washington state institute for public policy to facilitate access to data or other resources necessary to complete the work of this section.(6) By December 1, 2026, and in compliance with RCW 43.01.036, the Washington state institute for public policy shall submit a report to the appropriate committees of the legislature with the findings of its study under this section.(7) This section expires June 1, 2027.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. If specific funding for the purposes of this act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by June 30, 2025, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and void.--- END ---